Utah statutes.
76-8-504.6.   False or misleading information.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person, not under oath or affirmation, intentionally or knowingly provides false or misleading material information to:

(a)  an officer of the court for the purpose of influencing a criminal proceeding; or

(b)  the Bureau of Criminal Identification for the purpose of obtaining a certificate of eligibility for expungement.

(2)  For the purposes of this section "officer of the court" means:

(a)  prosecutor;

(b)  judge;

(c)  court clerk;

(d)  interpreter;

(e)  presentence investigator;

(f)  probation officer;

(g)  parole officer; and

(h)  any other person reasonably believed to be gathering information for a criminal proceeding.

(3)  This section does not apply under circumstances amounting to Section 76-8-306 or any other provision of this code carrying a greater penalty.



Amended by Chapter 283, 2010 General Session

